Missouri, session 2026, SB870.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 313.820, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 313.820,
to read as follows:
313.820. 1. An excursion boat licensee shall pay to
the commission an admission fee of [two] four dollars for
each person embarking on an excursion gambling boat with a
ticket of admission, with the amount of such fee adjusted
annually for inflation based on the Consumer Price Index for
All Urban Consumers, as defined and officially recorded by
the United States Department of Labor or its successor.
[One dollar] Fifty percent of such fee shall be deposited to
the credit of the gaming commission fund as authorized
pursuant to section 313.835, and [one dollar] fifty percent
of such fee shall not be considered state funds and shall be
paid to the home dock city or county. Subject to
appropriation, one cent of such fee deposited to the credit
of the gaming commission fund may be deposited to the credit
of the compulsive gamblers fund created pursuant to the
provisions of section 313.842. Nothing in this section
shall preclude any licensee from charging any amount deemed
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 870 2
necessary for a ticket of admission to any person embarking
on an excursion gambling boat. If tickets are issued which
are good for more than one excursion, the admission fee
shall be paid to the commission for each person using the
ticket on each excursion that the ticket is used. If free
passes or complimentary admission tickets are issued, the
excursion boat licensee shall pay to the commission the same
fee upon these passes or complimentary tickets as if they
were sold at the regular and usual admission rate; however,
the excursion boat licensee may issue fee-free passes to
actual and necessary officials and employees of the licensee
or other persons actually working on the excursion gambling
boat. The issuance of fee-free passes is subject to the
rules of the commission, and a list of all persons to whom
the fee-free passes are issued shall be filed with the
commission.
2. All licensees are subject to all income taxes,
sales taxes, earnings taxes, use taxes, property taxes or
any other tax or fee now or hereafter lawfully levied by any
political subdivision; however, no other license tax, permit
tax, occupation tax, excursion fee, or taxes or fees shall
be imposed, levied or assessed exclusively upon licensees by
a political subdivision. All state taxes not connected
directly to gambling games shall be collected by the
department of revenue. Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 32.057 to the contrary, the department of revenue
may furnish and the commission may receive tax information
to determine if applicants or licensees are complying with
the tax laws of this state; however, any tax information
acquired by the commission shall not become public record
and shall be used exclusively for commission business.
✓